Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1274YH (1) 91 lh/ko H.F. 13 Section 1. MEDICAID PROVIDER REIMBURSEMENT RATES ââ ANNUAL 1 AUTOMATIC INCREASES. Notwithstanding any provision of law 2 to the contrary regarding inflation factors or indexing of 3 Medicaid provider reimbursement rates, and in addition to any 4 other change in reimbursement rates specified for a fiscal 5 year, the department of health and human services shall 6 automatically increase the reimbursement rate of a provider 7 enrolled in the Medicaid program on July 1, annually, by either 8 applying the percentage equal to the increase in the consumer 9 price index for all urban consumers for the midwest region for 10 the most recent available twelve-month period published in the 11 federal register by the United States department of labor, 12 bureau of labor statistics, or by applying a two and one-half 13 percent increase, whichever is less, to the specific providerâs 14 current reimbursement rate. 15